Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.230

One reporter for two lesser districts.

An official court reporter may be appointed to serve two or more judicial districts, each of which has a total population under twenty-five thousand, if the judges thereof so agree, and the salary of such official reporter shall be determined by the total population of all the judicial districts so served in accordance with the schedule of salaries in RCW 2.32.210, and shall be apportioned between the several counties of the districts as therein provided. Such reporter, if appointed, must be qualified to serve, under RCW 2.32.180.

[ 1951 c 210 s 3; 1945 c 24 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 42-3b.]